Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF1043.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js H.F. 1043 DIVISION I 1 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP 2 Section 1. GENERAL FUND. 3 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 4 to the department of agriculture and land stewardship for the 5 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, 6 the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 7 used for the purposes designated: 8 For purposes of supporting the department, including its 9 divisions, for administration, regulation, and programs; for 10 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes; and 11 for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20,377,294 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 420.00 14 2. Of the amount appropriated in subsection 1, the following 15 amount is transferred to Iowa state university of science and 16 technology, to be used for the universityâs midwest grape and 17 wine industry institute: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 325,000 19 3. The department shall submit a report each quarter of 20 the fiscal year to the general assembly and the department 21 of management. The report shall describe in detail the 22 expenditure of moneys appropriated in this section to support 23 the departmentâs administration, regulation, and programs. 24 Sec. 2. UNCLAIMED PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING WINNINGS ââ 25 HORSE AND DOG RACING. There is appropriated from the moneys 26 available under section 99D.13 to the department of agriculture 27 and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 28 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so 29 much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 30 designated: 31 For purposes of supporting the departmentâs administration 32 and enforcement of horse and dog racing law pursuant to section 33 99D.22 , including for salaries, support, maintenance, and 34 miscellaneous purposes: 35 -1- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 1/ 31 H.F. 1043 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 305,516 1 Sec. 3. RENEWABLE FUEL INFRASTRUCTURE FUND ââ MOTOR 2 FUEL INSPECTION. There is appropriated from the renewable 3 fuel infrastructure fund created in section 159A.16 to the 4 department of agriculture and land stewardship for the fiscal 5 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 6 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 7 used for the purposes designated: 8 For purposes of the inspection of motor fuel, including 9 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 11 Sec. 4. SKILLED WORKER AND JOB CREATION FUND ââ BUTCHERY 12 INNOVATION AND REVITALIZATION PROGRAM. 13 1. There is appropriated from the Iowa skilled worker and 14 job creation fund created in section 8.57J to the department of 15 agriculture and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning 16 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, 17 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 18 designated: 19 For support of the butchery innovation and revitalization 20 program established pursuant to 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 21 1148, section 28, to award financial assistance to eligible 22 businesses for projects based on criteria described in section 23 15E.370: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 249,695 25 2. The department may use not more than 5 percent of the 26 moneys appropriated in subsection 1 to pay for the costs of 27 administering the program described in subsection 1. 28 3. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 29 subsection 1 that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 30 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 31 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 32 close of the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027. 33 Sec. 5. SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS FROM GENERAL FUND TO 34 DEPARTMENT. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 35 -2- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 2/ 31 H.F. 1043 state to the department of agriculture and land stewardship 1 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 2 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 3 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 4 1. DAIRY REGULATION 5 a. For purposes of performing functions pursuant to section 6 192.109 , including conducting a survey of grade âAâ milk and 7 certifying the results to the secretary of agriculture: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 189,196 9 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 10 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 11 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 12 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 13 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 14 2. LOCAL FOOD AND FARM PROGRAM 15 a. For purposes of supporting the local food and farm 16 program pursuant to chapter 267A : 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 125,000 18 b. Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, $50,000 is 19 allocated to the department to support a project conducted by 20 Iowa state university of science and technology to study the 21 ability of the choose Iowa food program, created under section 22 187.304, as enacted by this Act, to serve rural grocers. 23 c. The department shall enter into a cost-sharing agreement 24 with Iowa state university of science and technology to support 25 the local food and farm program coordinator position as part of 26 the universityâs cooperative extension service in agriculture 27 and home economics pursuant to chapter 267A . 28 d. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 29 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 30 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 31 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 32 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 33 3. AGRICULTURAL EDUCATION 34 a. For purposes of allocating moneys to an Iowa association 35 -3- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 3/ 31 H.F. 1043 affiliated with a national organization that promotes 1 agricultural education providing for future farmers: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 150,000 3 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 4 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 5 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 6 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 7 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 8 4. FOREIGN ANIMAL DISEASES AFFLICTING LIVESTOCK 9 For deposit in the foreign animal disease preparedness and 10 response fund created in section 163.3B for purposes designated 11 in that section: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,050,000 13 5. FARMERS WITH DISABILITIES PROGRAM 14 a. For purposes of supporting a program for farmers with 15 disabilities: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 230,000 17 b. The moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be 18 used for the public purpose of providing a grant to a national 19 nonprofit organization with over 80 years of experience in 20 assisting children and adults with disabilities and special 21 needs. The moneys shall be used to support a nationally 22 recognized program that began in 1986 and has been replicated 23 in at least 30 other states, but is not available through 24 any other entity in this state, and that provides assistance 25 to farmers with disabilities in all 99 counties to allow the 26 farmers to remain in their own homes and be gainfully engaged 27 in farming through provision of agricultural worksite and home 28 modification consultations, peer support services, services 29 to families, information and referral, and equipment loan 30 services. 31 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 32 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 33 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 34 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 35 -4- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 4/ 31 H.F. 1043 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 1 6. LOESS HILLS DEVELOPMENT AND CONSERVATION FUND 2 a. For deposit in the loess hills development and 3 conservation fund created pursuant to section 161D.2 : 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 5 b. (1) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, 6 $260,000 shall be allocated to the fundâs hungry canyons 7 account. 8 (2) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys allocated in this 9 paragraph may be used for administrative costs. 10 c. (1) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, 11 $40,000 shall be allocated to the fundâs loess hills alliance 12 account. 13 (2) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys allocated in this 14 paragraph may be used for administrative costs. 15 7. SOUTHERN IOWA DEVELOPMENT AND CONSERVATION FUND 16 a. For deposit in the southern Iowa development and 17 conservation fund created pursuant to section 161D.12: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 19 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated in 20 this subsection may be used for administrative costs. 21 8. GRAIN REGULATION 22 For the administration and enforcement of chapters 203 23 and 203C , including salaries, support, maintenance, and 24 miscellaneous purposes: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 350,000 26 9. CHOOSE IOWA FUND 27 a. For deposit in the choose Iowa fund created in section 28 187.201: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,813,000 30 b. (1) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, 31 the department shall use at least $500,000 to support the 32 value-added agricultural grant program created in section 33 187.321. 34 (2) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, the 35 -5- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 5/ 31 H.F. 1043 department may use up to $813,000 to support the choose Iowa 1 promotional program as provided in chapter 187, subchapter III, 2 part 1. 3 (3) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, the 4 department shall use at least $500,000 to support the dairy 5 innovation and revitalization program created in section 6 187.311. 7 c. The department may increase or decrease the amount of 8 moneys used to support a program described in paragraph âbâ 9 based on the amount of moneys awarded to persons participating 10 in the program. The department shall publish a notice of the 11 departmentâs action to increase or decrease the amount on the 12 departmentâs internet site where the programs are advertised at 13 least thirty days prior to the day that the department takes 14 such action. 15 10. CHOOSE IOWA FOOD PURCHASING PROGRAM 16 a. For purposes of supporting the choose Iowa food 17 purchasing program to assist eligible participants in 18 purchasing qualified food products pursuant to section 187.331, 19 as enacted by this Act: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 21 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 22 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 23 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 24 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 25 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 26 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 187.331 Choose Iowa food purchasing 27 program. 28 1. There is created within the department a choose Iowa food 29 purchasing program. 30 2. The department shall administer the program according to 31 all of the following: 32 a. A farm or business that owns or operates the farm 33 source shall be given a preference to participate in the 34 program if the farm or business is currently participating 35 -6- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 6/ 31 H.F. 1043 in the choose Iowa promotional program as provided in this 1 part 1 of subchapter III. Otherwise, a farm or business may 2 participate in the program if the farm or business has applied 3 to participate in the choose Iowa promotional program and the 4 department determines that the application will be approved. 5 b. An eligible participant is limited to any Iowa food bank 6 or an Iowa emergency feeding organization, recognized by the 7 department. 8 c. A qualified food product is limited to meat and poultry, 9 dairy products, grains, flour, eggs, honey, and produce. 10 3. a. Of the moneys appropriated to support the program in 11 a fiscal year, not more than one hundred fifty thousand dollars 12 shall be used to reimburse Iowa food banks and Iowa emergency 13 feeding organizations. 14 b. An eligible participant shall be reimbursed on a matching 15 basis with the department contributing one dollar for every one 16 dollar expended by the eligible participant. 17 c. An Iowa food bank or Iowa emergency feeding organization 18 shall not receive more than fifty thousand dollars per fiscal 19 year for participating in the program. 20 4. The department may use not more than five percent of the 21 moneys appropriated to support the program in a fiscal year to 22 pay for the costs of administering the program. 23 5. The department shall prepare and submit a report 24 regarding its findings and recommendations to the governor and 25 general assembly not later than January 15 of each year. 26 6. This section is repealed July 1, 2030. 27 Sec. 7. DIRECTIONS TO CODE EDITOR. The Code editor shall 28 designate section 187.331, as enacted in this division of this 29 Act, as a new part within chapter 187, subchapter III, entitled 30 âChoose Iowa Food Purchasing Programâ. 31 DIVISION II 32 DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES 33 Sec. 8. GENERAL FUND. 34 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 35 -7- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 7/ 31 H.F. 1043 to the department of natural resources for the fiscal year 1 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 2 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 3 purposes designated: 4 For purposes of supporting the department, including its 5 divisions, for administration, regulation, and programs; for 6 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes; and 7 for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,816,738 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 1,145.95 10 2. Of the number of full-time equivalent positions 11 authorized to the department pursuant to subsection 1, 50.00 12 full-time equivalent positions shall be allocated by the 13 department for seasonal employees for purposes of providing 14 maintenance, upkeep, and sanitary services at state parks. 15 This subsection shall not impact conservation officer, park 16 ranger, or park manager positions within the department. 17 3. The department shall submit a report each quarter of 18 the fiscal year to the general assembly and the department 19 of management. The report shall describe in detail the 20 expenditure of moneys appropriated under this section to 21 support the departmentâs administration, regulation, and 22 programs. 23 Sec. 9. STATE FISH AND GAME PROTECTION FUND ââ REGULATION 24 AND ADVANCEMENT OF OUTDOOR ACTIVITIES. 25 1. There is appropriated from the state fish and game 26 protection fund created pursuant to section 456A.17 to the 27 department of natural resources for the fiscal year beginning 28 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, 29 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 30 designated: 31 For purposes of supporting the regulation or advancement of 32 hunting, fishing, or trapping, or the protection, propagation, 33 restoration, management, or harvest of fish or wildlife, 34 including for administration, regulation, law enforcement, and 35 -8- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 8/ 31 H.F. 1043 programs; and for salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, 1 and miscellaneous purposes: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 51,404,790 3 2. Notwithstanding section 455A.10 , the department may use 4 the unappropriated balance remaining in the state fish and game 5 protection fund to provide for the funding of health and life 6 insurance premium payments from unused sick leave balances of 7 conservation peace officers employed in a protection occupation 8 who retire, pursuant to section 97B.49B . 9 3. Notwithstanding section 455A.10 , the department may 10 use the unappropriated balance remaining in the state fish 11 and game protection fund for the fiscal year beginning July 12 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, as is necessary to fund 13 salary adjustments for departmental employees for which the 14 general assembly has made an operating budget appropriation in 15 subsection 1. 16 Sec. 10. GROUNDWATER PROTECTION FUND ââ WATER 17 QUALITY. There is appropriated from the groundwater protection 18 fund created in section 455E.11 to the department of natural 19 resources for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, 20 and ending June 30, 2026, from those moneys that are not 21 allocated pursuant to that section, the following amount, or 22 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 23 designated: 24 For purposes of supporting the departmentâs protection 25 of the stateâs groundwater, including for administration, 26 regulation, and programs, and for salaries, support, 27 maintenance, equipment, and miscellaneous purposes: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,455,850 29 Sec. 11. SPECIAL SNOWMOBILE FUND ââ SNOWMOBILE 30 PROGRAM. There is appropriated from the special snowmobile 31 fund created under section 321G.7 to the department of natural 32 resources for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 33 ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof 34 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 35 -9- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 9/ 31 H.F. 1043 For purposes of administering and enforcing the state 1 snowmobile programs: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 3 Sec. 12. SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS FROM GENERAL FUND TO 4 DEPARTMENT. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 5 state to the department of natural resources for the fiscal 6 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 7 following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 8 used for the purposes designated: 9 1. FLOODPLAIN MANAGEMENT AND DAM SAFETY 10 a. For purposes of supporting floodplain management and dam 11 safety: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,510,000 13 b. Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, up to 14 $400,000 may be used by the department to acquire or install 15 stream gages for purposes of tracking and predicting flood 16 events and for compiling necessary data to improve flood 17 frequency analysis. 18 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 19 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 20 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 21 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 22 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 23 2. FORESTRY HEALTH MANAGEMENT 24 a. For purposes of providing for forestry health management 25 programs: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 525,000 27 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 28 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 29 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 30 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 31 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 32 3. STATE PARK OPERATIONS 33 For supporting operations at state parks, including 34 maintenance and repair of grounds and facilities: 35 -10- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 10/ 31 H.F. 1043 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 1 4. STATE PARK MAINTENANCE 2 For structural and infrastructural repairs in state parks: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 4 DIVISION III 5 IOWA STATE UNIVERSITY 6 Sec. 13. SPECIAL GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS. There is 7 appropriated from the general fund of the state to Iowa state 8 university of science and technology for the fiscal year 9 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 10 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 11 purposes designated: 12 1. VETERINARY DIAGNOSTIC LABORATORY 13 a. For purposes of supporting the college of veterinary 14 medicine for the operation of the veterinary diagnostic 15 laboratory, and for not more than the following full-time 16 equivalent positions: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,799,898 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 51.00 19 b. (1) Iowa state university of science and technology 20 shall not reduce the amount that it allocates to support the 21 college of veterinary medicine from any other source due to the 22 appropriation made in this subsection. 23 (2) Subparagraph (1) does not apply to a reduction made 24 to support the college of veterinary medicine if the same 25 percentage of reduction imposed on the college of veterinary 26 medicine is also imposed on all of Iowa state university of 27 science and technologyâs budget units. 28 c. If by June 30, 2026, Iowa state university of science 29 and technology fails to allocate the moneys appropriated in 30 this subsection to the college of veterinary medicine in 31 accordance with this subsection, the moneys appropriated in 32 this subsection for that fiscal year shall revert to the 33 general fund of the state. 34 2. MANAGEMENT OF PRIVATE FORESTS 35 -11- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 11/ 31 H.F. 1043 a. For purposes of supporting the Iowa cooperative 1 extension service in agriculture and home economics in 2 providing technical support to landowners and loggers regarding 3 the management of private forests in northeast Iowa, and for 4 not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 150,000 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 1.00 7 b. The department of natural resources shall cooperate with 8 the Iowa cooperative extension service in agriculture and home 9 economics in administering this subsection. 10 3. LIVESTOCK DISEASE RESEARCH 11 a. For deposit in the livestock disease research fund 12 created in section 267.8 : 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 291,390 14 b. Moneys appropriated under this subsection shall be used 15 by Iowa state university of science and technology to support 16 animal disease research in areas of importance to livestock 17 producers. 18 Sec. 14. IOWA NUTRIENT REDUCTION FUND ââ VETERINARY 19 DIAGNOSTIC LABORATORY. Notwithstanding section 466B.46, there 20 is appropriated from the Iowa nutrient research fund created 21 in section 466B.46 to Iowa state university of science and 22 technology for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 23 ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof 24 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 25 For purposes of supporting the college of veterinary 26 medicine for the operation of the veterinary diagnostic 27 laboratory: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 120,000 29 DIVISION IV 30 STATE UNIVERSITY OF IOWA 31 Sec. 15. IOWAâS CENTER FOR AGRICULTURAL SAFETY AND HEALTH 32 (I-CASH). 33 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 34 to the state university of Iowa for the fiscal year beginning 35 -12- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 12/ 31 H.F. 1043 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, 1 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 2 designated: 3 For supporting the operations of Iowaâs center for 4 agricultural safety and health, as part of the universityâs 5 college of public health, and in cooperation with the 6 department of agriculture and land stewardship, to anticipate, 7 recognize, and prevent occupational illness and injury among 8 members of the agricultural community: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 128,154 10 2. a. As a condition of the appropriation made in 11 subsection 1, the state university of Iowa shall retain the 12 director of Iowaâs center for agricultural safety and health 13 employed on the effective date of this division of this Act for 14 at least the same number of hours for the fiscal year beginning 15 July 1, 2025, as worked by the director during the fiscal year 16 beginning July 1, 2024. 17 b. As a condition of the appropriation made in subsection 18 1, the state university of Iowa shall not reduce the amount 19 allocated to support Iowaâs center for agricultural safety and 20 health from any other source due to the appropriation made in 21 subsection 1. 22 3. If by June 30, 2026, the state university of Iowa fails 23 to use the moneys appropriated in subsection 1 in accordance 24 with the purposes and conditions of subsections 1 and 2, any 25 unencumbered or unobligated moneys appropriated in subsection 26 1 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 27 30, 2026, shall revert to the general fund of the state. In 28 addition, if moneys revert as required pursuant to section 29 8.33 , the state university of Iowa shall transfer to the 30 general fund of the state from any otherwise unencumbered or 31 unobligated moneys from any other general fund appropriation or 32 from any moneys available from other funding sources an amount 33 equal to the amount appropriated in subsection 1 less any 34 amount that reverted to the general fund of the state pursuant 35 -13- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 13/ 31 H.F. 1043 to section 8.33 . 1 Sec. 16. IOWA GEOLOGICAL SURVEY ââ GROUNDWATER PLANNING AND 2 RESOURCE ASSESSMENT PROJECT. 3 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 4 to the state university of Iowa for the fiscal year beginning 5 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, 6 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 7 designated: 8 For purposes of supporting a groundwater planning and 9 resource assessment project to be administered by the Iowa 10 geological survey of the state as created pursuant to section 11 456.1: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 13 2. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be used 14 by the Iowa geological survey to map and assess the condition 15 of this stateâs aquifers. The Iowa geological survey may 16 measure the volume of groundwater that is available for various 17 uses, the current and predicted allocations of groundwater to 18 support those uses, the recharge rate for the aquifers, and 19 the development of models for budgeting this stateâs water 20 resources. 21 3. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 22 subsection 1 that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 23 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 24 available for expenditure for the purposes designated in 25 subsection 1. 26 DIVISION V 27 ENVIRONMENT FIRST FUND ââ GENERAL APPROPRIATIONS 28 Sec. 17. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND 29 STEWARDSHIP. There is appropriated from the environment first 30 fund created in section 8.57A to the department of agriculture 31 and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 32 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so 33 much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 34 designated: 35 -14- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 14/ 31 H.F. 1043 1. CONSERVATION RESERVE ENHANCEMENT PROGRAM (CREP) 1 a. For the conservation reserve enhancement program to 2 restore and construct wetlands for the purposes of intercepting 3 tile line runoff, reducing nutrient loss, improving water 4 quality, and enhancing agricultural production practices: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 6 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated 7 in paragraph âaâ may be used for costs of administration and 8 implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 9 c. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 10 department may use moneys appropriated in this subsection, 11 in combination with other appropriate environment first 12 fund appropriations, for cost sharing to match United States 13 department of agriculture, natural resources conservation 14 service, wetlands reserve enhancement program (WREP) funding 15 available to Iowa. 16 2. WATERSHED PROTECTION 17 a. For continuation of a program that provides 18 multiobjective resource protections for flood control, water 19 quality, erosion control, and natural resource conservation: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 900,000 21 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated 22 in paragraph âaâ may be used for costs of administration and 23 implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 24 3. CONSERVATION RESERVE PROGRAM (CRP) 25 a. To encourage and assist farmers in enrolling in and the 26 implementation of the federal conservation reserve program and 27 to work with them to enhance their revegetation efforts to 28 improve water quality and habitat: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 900,000 30 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated 31 in paragraph âaâ may be used for costs of administration and 32 implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 33 4. SOIL AND WATER CONSERVATION 34 a. For use by the department in providing for soil and water 35 -15- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 15/ 31 H.F. 1043 conservation: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,325,000 2 b. (1) Of the amount appropriated in paragraph âaâ, for 3 transfer to the hungry canyons account of the loess hills 4 development and conservation fund created in section 161D.2 : 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 140,000 6 (2) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys transferred in 7 subparagraph (1) may be used for administrative costs. 8 c. Of the remaining amount appropriated in paragraph âaâ, 9 for use by the department in providing for soil and water 10 conservation administration, the conservation of soil and 11 water resources, or the support of soil and water conservation 12 districts: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,185,000 14 d. Of the amount appropriated in paragraph âcâ that the 15 department allocates to a soil and water conservation district, 16 the first $15,000 may be expended by the district for the 17 purpose of providing financial incentives under section 161A.73 18 to establish management practices for the control of soil 19 erosion on land that is row-cropped, including but not limited 20 to nontill planting, ridge-till planting, and contouring 21 strip-cropping. Of any remaining amount of that appropriation 22 allocated by the department to a district, 30 percent may be 23 expended by the district for that same purpose. 24 e. Not more than 5 percent of the moneys appropriated in 25 paragraph âcâ may be allocated for cost sharing to address 26 complaints filed under section 161A.47 . 27 f. Of the moneys appropriated in paragraph âcâ, 5 percent 28 shall be allocated for financial incentives to establish 29 practices to protect watersheds above publicly owned lakes of 30 the state from soil erosion and sediment as provided in section 31 161A.73 . 32 g. The division of soil conservation and water quality 33 created within the department pursuant to section 159.5 may 34 allocate moneys appropriated in paragraph âcâ to conduct 35 -16- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 16/ 31 H.F. 1043 research and demonstration projects to promote conservation 1 tillage and nonpoint source pollution control practices. 2 h. The allocation of moneys as financial incentives as 3 provided in section 161A.73 may be used in combination with 4 moneys allocated by the department of natural resources. 5 i. Not more than 15 percent of the moneys appropriated 6 in paragraph âcâ may be used for costs of administration and 7 implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 8 5. SOIL AND WATER CONSERVATION ââ ADMINISTRATION 9 a. For use by the department for costs of administration and 10 implementation of soil and water conservation practices: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,800,000 12 b. Of the moneys appropriated in paragraph âaâ, $150,000 13 is allocated to support field staff providing technical 14 assistance. 15 Sec. 18. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES. There is 16 appropriated from the environment first fund created in section 17 8.57A to the department of natural resources for the fiscal 18 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 19 following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 20 used for the purposes designated: 21 1. STATE PARK MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS 22 For regular maintenance and operations of state parks and 23 staff time associated with these activities: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,235,000 25 2. GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEM (GIS) 26 To provide local watershed managers with geographic 27 information system data for their use in developing, 28 monitoring, and displaying results of their watershed work: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 195,000 30 3. WATER QUALITY MONITORING 31 For continuing the establishment and operation of water 32 quality monitoring stations: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,955,000 34 4. PUBLIC WATER SUPPLY SYSTEM ACCOUNT 35 -17- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 17/ 31 H.F. 1043 For deposit in the public water supply system account of the 1 water quality protection fund created in section 455B.183A : 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 3 5. REGULATION OF ANIMAL FEEDING OPERATIONS 4 For the regulation of animal feeding operations, including 5 as provided for in chapters 459 , 459A , and 459B : 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,320,000 7 6. FLOODPLAIN MANAGEMENT AND DAM SAFETY 8 For supporting floodplain management and dam safety: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 375,000 10 7. AMBIENT AIR QUALITY 11 For the abatement, control, and prevention of ambient 12 air pollution in this state, including measures as necessary 13 to assure attainment and maintenance of ambient air quality 14 standards from particulate matter: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 425,000 16 Sec. 19. STATE UNIVERSITY OF IOWA ââ IOWA GEOLOGICAL 17 SURVEY. There is appropriated from the environment first 18 fund created in section 8.57A to the state university of Iowa 19 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 20 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 21 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 22 1. IOWA GEOLOGICAL SURVEY OPERATIONS 23 For purposes of supporting the operations of the Iowa 24 geological survey of the state as created within the state 25 university of Iowa pursuant to section 456.1 , including but not 26 limited to providing analysis; data maintenance, collection, 27 and compilation; investigative programs; and information for 28 water supply development and protection: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 30 2. WATER RESOURCE MANAGEMENT 31 For purposes of supporting the Iowa geological survey in 32 measuring, assessing, and evaluating the quantity of water 33 sources in this state and assisting the department of natural 34 resources in regulating water quantity as provided in chapter 35 -18- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 18/ 31 H.F. 1043 455B, subchapter III, part 4 , pursuant to sections 455B.262B 1 and 456.14 : 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 495,000 3 Sec. 20. REVERSION. 4 1. a. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ, and 5 notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated for the 6 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, in this division of this 7 Act that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of 8 the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available 9 for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of 10 the succeeding fiscal year, or until the project for which the 11 appropriation was made is completed, whichever is earlier. 12 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated for 13 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, in this division of 14 this Act to the department of agriculture and land stewardship 15 to provide financial assistance for the establishment of 16 permanent soil and water conservation practices that remain 17 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year 18 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure 19 for the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year 20 beginning July 1, 2028. 21 2. Subsection 1 does not apply to moneys transferred 22 pursuant to this division of this Act to the loess hills 23 development and conservation fund created in section 161D.2 , 24 which shall not revert as provided in that section. 25 DIVISION VI 26 ENVIRONMENT FIRST FUND ââ SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS 27 Sec. 21. WATER QUALITY INITIATIVE ââ DEPARTMENT OF 28 AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP. 29 1. There is appropriated from the environment first fund 30 created in section 8.57A to the department of agriculture 31 and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 32 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so 33 much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 34 designated: 35 -19- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 19/ 31 H.F. 1043 For deposit in the water quality initiative fund created in 1 section 466B.45 , for purposes of supporting the water quality 2 initiative administered by the division of soil conservation 3 and water quality as provided in section 466B.42 , including 4 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,375,000 6 2. a. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be 7 used to support projects in subwatersheds as designated by the 8 division that are part of high-priority watersheds identified 9 by the water resources coordinating council established 10 pursuant to section 466B.3 . 11 b. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be used to 12 support projects in watersheds generally, including regional 13 watersheds, as designated by the division and high-priority 14 watersheds identified by the water resources coordinating 15 council established pursuant to section 466B.3 . 16 3. In supporting projects in subwatersheds and watersheds 17 as provided in subsection 2, all of the following apply: 18 a. The demonstration projects shall utilize water quality 19 practices as described in the Iowa nutrient reduction strategy 20 as defined in section 455B.171 . 21 b. The division shall implement demonstration projects as 22 provided in paragraph âaâ by providing for participation by 23 persons who hold a legal interest in agricultural land used in 24 farming. To every extent practical, the division shall provide 25 for collaborative participation by such persons who hold a 26 legal interest in agricultural land located within the same 27 subwatershed. 28 c. The division shall implement a demonstration project on 29 a cost-share basis as determined by the division. However, 30 except for edge-of-field practices, the stateâs share of the 31 amount shall not exceed 50 percent of the estimated cost of 32 establishing the practice as determined by the division or 33 50 percent of the actual cost of establishing the practice, 34 whichever is less. 35 -20- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 20/ 31 H.F. 1043 d. The demonstration projects shall be used to educate other 1 persons about the feasibility and value of establishing similar 2 water quality practices. The division shall promote field day 3 events for purposes of allowing interested persons to establish 4 water quality practices on their agricultural land. 5 e. The division shall conduct water quality evaluations 6 within supported subwatersheds. Within a reasonable period 7 after accumulating information from such evaluations, the 8 division shall create an aggregated database of water quality 9 practices. Any information identifying a person holding a 10 legal interest in agricultural land or specific agricultural 11 land shall be a confidential record under section 22.7 . 12 4. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be used 13 to support education and outreach in a manner that encourages 14 persons who hold a legal interest in agricultural land used for 15 farming to implement water quality practices, including the 16 establishment of such practices in watersheds generally, and 17 not limited to subwatersheds or high-priority watersheds. 18 5. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 may be used 19 to contract with persons to coordinate the implementation of 20 efforts provided in this section. 21 6. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 may be used by 22 the department to support urban soil and water conservation 23 efforts, which may include but are not limited to management 24 practices related to bioretention, landscaping, the use of 25 permeable or pervious pavement, and soil quality restoration. 26 The moneys shall be allocated on a cost-share basis as provided 27 in chapter 161A . 28 7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 29 contrary, the department may use moneys appropriated in 30 subsection 1 to carry out the provisions of this section on a 31 cost-share basis in combination with other moneys available to 32 the department from a state or federal source. 33 8. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated in 34 this section may be used to pay for the costs of administering 35 -21- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 21/ 31 H.F. 1043 and implementing the water quality initiative by the 1 departmentâs division of soil conservation and water quality as 2 provided in section 466B.42 and this section. 3 DIVISION VII 4 RESOURCES ENHANCEMENT AND PROTECTION ââ OPEN SPACES 5 Sec. 22. REAP ââ IN LIEU OF GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATION. In 6 lieu of the standing appropriation in section 455A.18 , there is 7 appropriated from the environment first fund created in section 8 8.57A to the Iowa resources enhancement and protection fund 9 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 10 30, 2026, the following amount, to be allocated as provided in 11 section 455A.19 : 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,000,000 13 Sec. 23. REAP ââ OPEN SPACES ACCOUNT ââ STATE PARK 14 MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS, AND FACILITY REFURBISHMENT. 15 Notwithstanding section 455A.19, subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ, 16 subparagraph (1), of the moneys allocated to the open spaces 17 account of the Iowa resources enhancement and protection fund, 18 up to $1,000,000 may be used by the department of natural 19 resources for state park maintenance, development, operations, 20 and facility refurbishment for the fiscal year beginning July 21 1, 2025, and ending on June 30, 2026. 22 Sec. 24. Section 455A.18, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 23 2025, is amended to read as follows: 24 a. For each fiscal year of the fiscal period beginning 25 July 1, 1997, and ending June 30, 2026 2028 , there is 26 appropriated from the general fund, to the Iowa resources 27 enhancement and protection fund, the amount of twenty million 28 dollars, to be used as provided in this chapter . However, 29 in any fiscal year of the fiscal period, if moneys from the 30 lottery are appropriated by the state to the fund, the amount 31 appropriated under this subsection shall be reduced by the 32 amount appropriated from the lottery. 33 DIVISION VIII 34 ANIMAL DISEASE PREPAREDNESS AND RESPONSE 35 -22- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 22/ 31 H.F. 1043 Sec. 25. IOWA ANIMAL DISEASE PREVENTION FUND ââ SPECIAL 1 APPROPRIATIONS. 2 1. a. There is appropriated from the Iowa animal disease 3 prevention fund created in section 165.18, as amended by this 4 Act, to the department of agriculture and land stewardship for 5 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 6 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 7 to be used for the purposes designated: 8 (1) For purposes of purchasing and maintaining equipment 9 to further the implementation of the foreign animal disease 10 preparedness and response strategy developed under section 11 163.3C: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 13 (2) For purposes of assisting in the development of vaccines 14 against foreign animal diseases by a company based in Iowa that 15 develops livestock and other animal vaccines: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 17 (3) For deposit in the foreign animal disease preparedness 18 and response fund created in section 163.3B for purposes 19 designated in that section: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 21 (4) For purposes of upgrading information technology 22 resources used by the department: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 450,000 24 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 25 this section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 26 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 27 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 28 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 29 2. There is appropriated from the Iowa animal disease 30 prevention fund created in section 165.18, as amended by this 31 Act, to Iowa state university of science and technology for the 32 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, 33 the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 34 used for the purposes designated: 35 -23- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 23/ 31 H.F. 1043 a. To assist the college of veterinary medicine veterinary 1 diagnostic laboratory in installing and moving equipment into 2 its refurbished facility: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 4 b. (1) For deposit in the livestock disease research fund 5 created in section 267.8: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 7 (2) Moneys appropriated under this paragraph shall be used 8 by Iowa state university of science and technology to support 9 animal disease research in areas of importance to livestock 10 producers. 11 Sec. 26. Section 159.5, subsection 11, paragraph a, 12 subparagraph (5), Code 2025, is amended by striking the 13 subparagraph. 14 Sec. 27. Section 163.3B, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 15 to read as follows: 16 3. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department and 17 shall be used exclusively to develop, establish, and implement 18 for the following purposes: 19 a. Developing, establishing, and implementing a foreign 20 animal disease preparedness and response strategy as described 21 in section 163.3C , and shall not require further special 22 authorization by the general assembly . 23 b. Supporting activities related to animal health and 24 disease response that strengthen the stateâs overall ability 25 to prevent, prepare for, and respond to emerging or reemerging 26 animal diseases, including but not limited to salaries, 27 support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes. 28 Sec. 28. Section 163.10, Code 2025, is amended to read as 29 follows: 30 163.10 Quarantining or destroying animals. 31 The department may quarantine or destroy any animal exposed 32 to or afflicted with an infectious or contagious disease. 33 However, cattle exposed to or infected with tuberculosis shall 34 not be destroyed without the ownerâs consent, unless there 35 -24- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 24/ 31 H.F. 1043 are sufficient moneys to reimburse the owner for the cattle, 1 which may be paid as an expense authorized as provided in 2 section 163.15 , from moneys in the brucellosis and tuberculosis 3 eradication fund created in section 165.18 , or from moneys made 4 available by the United States department of agriculture. 5 Sec. 29. Section 164.6, Code 2025, is amended to read as 6 follows: 7 164.6 Expense of test. 8 The expense for an inspection and official test of a 9 designated animal other than for bovine animals shall be borne 10 by the owner. If the designated animal is a bovine animal, and 11 the owner agrees to comply with and carry out the provisions 12 of this chapter and the rules adopted by the department under 13 section 164.4 , the expense of the inspection and test shall be 14 borne by the United States department of agriculture , or by the 15 department, or by the brucellosis and tuberculosis eradication 16 fund or any combination of these sources. 17 Sec. 30. Section 164.21, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2025, are 18 amended to read as follows: 19 2. The owner shall be indemnified to the extent that money 20 is available in the brucellosis and tuberculosis eradication 21 fund as created in section 165.18 and indemnification is also 22 made by the United States department of agriculture. However, 23 if the United States department of agriculture is unable to 24 indemnify the owner, the department may indemnify the owner, if 25 money is moneys are available. 26 3. In the case of individual payment, all cattle shall 27 be individually appraised and the amount of indemnity shall 28 be equal to the difference between the slaughter value and 29 the appraisal price, less the amount of indemnity paid by 30 the United States department of agriculture. Bison shall 31 be appraised as if the bison are beef cattle. The total 32 amount of indemnity paid by the brucellosis and tuberculosis 33 eradication fund for a grade animal or a purebred animal shall 34 not exceed two hundred dollars. However, if If purebred cattle 35 -25- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 25/ 31 H.F. 1043 are purchased and owned for at least one year before testing 1 and the owner can verify the actual cost, the department may 2 further indemnify the owner. The amount of the indemnification 3 shall not exceed five hundred fifty dollars or the actual cost 4 of the animal when purchased, whichever is less. 5 Sec. 31. Section 165.18, Code 2025, is amended to read as 6 follows: 7 165.18 Brucellosis and tuberculosis eradication Iowa animal 8 disease prevention fund. 9 1. A brucellosis and tuberculosis eradication fund is 10 created in the office of the secretary of agriculture, to be 11 used together with state and federal funds available to pay: 12 a. The indemnity and other expenses provided in this 13 chapter . 14 b. The indemnity as set out in section 164.21 and other 15 expenses provided in chapter 164 . 16 c. The expenses of the inspection and testing program 17 provided in chapter 163A , but only to the extent that the 18 moneys in the fund are not required for expenses incurred under 19 chapter 164 or this chapter . 20 d. Indemnities as provided in section 159.5, subsection 21 11 , but only to the extent that the moneys in the fund are not 22 required to pay expenses under chapter 163A , chapter 164 , or 23 this chapter . 24 2. If it appears to the secretary of agriculture that the 25 balance in the fund on January 20 is insufficient to carry 26 on the work in the state for the following fiscal year, the 27 secretary shall notify the board of supervisors of each county 28 to levy an amount sufficient to pay the expenses estimated to 29 be incurred under subsection 1 for the following fiscal year, 30 subject to a maximum levy of thirty-three and three-fourths 31 cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of all taxable 32 property in the county. 33 3. Not later than December 15 or June 15 of a year in which 34 the tax is collected, the county treasurer shall transmit the 35 -26- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 26/ 31 H.F. 1043 amount of the tax levied and collected to the treasurer of 1 state, who shall credit it to the brucellosis and tuberculosis 2 eradication fund. 3 1. An Iowa animal disease prevention fund is created in 4 the state treasury under the control and management of the 5 department. 6 2. The fund shall include moneys appropriated by the general 7 assembly credited to the fund. The fund may include other 8 moneys available to and obtained or accepted by the department 9 as provided in section 159.6A, including but not limited to the 10 federal government, other public sources, or private sources. 11 3. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department to 12 develop, establish, and implement an animal disease prevention 13 strategy. 14 4. a. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, interest or earnings 15 on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. 16 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund that 17 remain unencumbered or unobligated at the end of a fiscal year 18 shall not revert. 19 Sec. 32. Section 331.512, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code 20 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 21 Sec. 33. Section 331.559, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 22 amended by striking the subsection. 23 Sec. 34. TRANSFER OF MONEYS. There is transferred from the 24 brucellosis and tuberculosis eradication fund created pursuant 25 to section 165.18, Code 2025, to the Iowa animal disease 26 prevention fund created pursuant to section 165.18, as amended 27 by this Act, all unencumbered or unobligated moneys remaining 28 on the effective date of this division of this Act. 29 DIVISION IX 30 PROCEEDS FROM SALES OF REAL PROPERTY ââ EXPENDITURES FOR STATE 31 PARKS 32 Sec. 35. Section 461A.32, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 33 amended to read as follows: 34 1. The commission may sell or exchange such parts of public 35 -27- LSB 1001HV (2) 91 sb/js 27/ 31 H.F. 1043 lands or structures under the jurisdiction of the commission as 1 in its judgment may be undesirable for conservation purposes, 2 excepting state-owned meandered lands already surveyed and 3 platted at state expense as a conservation plan and project 4 tentatively adopted and now in the process of rehabilitation 5 and development authorized by a special legislative Act. The 6 sale or exchange shall be made upon the terms, conditions , 7 or considerations as the commission may approve, whereupon 8 the secretary of state shall issue a patent therefor in the 9 manner provided by law in other cases. Moneys generated from 10 any such sale from a state park shall be deposited in the 11 state conservation fund created in section 456A.17 and are 12 appropriated to the department to be used for purposes of that 13 fund at the specific state park from which the moneys were 14 generated. The proceeds of any other such sale or exchange 15 shall become a part of the funds moneys to be expended under 16 the provisions of this chapter . 17